Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.110

Lease of space—Surplus space.

All office or other space made available through the provisions of this chapter shall be leased by the director to such state or federal agencies, for such rental, and on such terms and conditions as he or she deems advisable: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, If space becomes surplus, the director is authorized to lease office or other space in any project to any person, corporation or body politic, for such period as the director shall determine said space is surplus, and upon such other terms and conditions as he or she may prescribe.

[ 1994 c 219 s 13; 1969 c 121 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.82.110. Prior: 1961 c 184 s 4; 1959 c 255 s 11.]

NOTES:

Finding—1994 c 219: See note following RCW 43.88.030.